Mississippi, session 2026, HB1684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  A segment of Mississippi Highway 7 located in Grenada County, Mississippi, and extending for a distance of approximately one (1) mile, is designated and shall be known as the "Robert Noah Memorial Highway." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.